Wisconsin, session 2025, AB353.
do enact as follows:AB353,11Section 1. 50.32 of the statutes is amended to read:AB353,2,3250.32 Hospital regulation and approval act. Sections 50.32 to 50.39 350.42 shall constitute the “Hospital Regulation and Approval Act”.AB353,24Section 2. 50.33 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB353,2,5550.33 Definitions. (intro.) Whenever used in ss. 50.32 to 50.39 50.42:AB353,36Section 3. 50.33 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB353,3,3150.33 (3) “Requirements for hospitals” means all of the rules, standards, and 2requirements described in or promulgated under ss. 50.32 to 50.39 50.42 that apply 3to hospitals, including the standards described under s. 50.36 (1).AB353,44Section 4. 50.34 of the statutes is amended to read:AB353,3,9550.34 Purpose. The purpose of ss. 50.32 to 50.39 50.42 is to provide for the 6development, establishment and enforcement of rules and standards for the 7construction, maintenance and operation of hospitals which, in the light of 8advancing knowledge, will promote safe and adequate care and treatment of 9patients in such hospitals.AB353,510Section 5. 50.36 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB353,4,71150.36 (1) The department may use and enforce the conditions in 42 CFR 12482.60 as standards that apply to psychiatric hospitals, which are hospitals 13primarily engaged in providing psychiatric services for the diagnosis and treatment 14of persons who have mental illness. Beginning on July 1, 2016, except as otherwise 15provided under ss. 50.32 to 50.39 50.42, the department shall use and enforce the 16conditions for Medicare participation for hospitals as the minimum standards that 17apply to hospitals. The department shall interpret the conditions for Medicare 18participation for hospitals using guidelines adopted by the federal centers for 19medicare and medicaid services, unless the department determines that a different 20interpretation is reasonably necessary to protect public health and safety. The 21department may promulgate, adopt, amend, and enforce additional rules and 22standards for the construction, maintenance, and operation of hospitals that the 23department determines are necessary to provide safe and adequate care and 24treatment of hospital patients and to protect the health and safety of the patients 1and employees. The building codes and construction standards of the department 2of safety and professional services shall apply to all hospitals to the extent that they 3are not incompatible with any building codes or construction standards required by 4the conditions for Medicare participation for hospitals. Except for the construction 5codes and standards of the department of safety and professional services and 6except as provided in s. 50.39 (3), the department shall be the sole agency to adopt 7and enforce rules and standards pertaining to hospitals.AB353,68Section 6. 50.39 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB353,4,11950.39 (1) The requirements for hospitals apply to all facilities coming under 10the definition of a “hospital” which are not specifically exempt by ss. 50.32 to 50.39 1150.42.AB353,712Section 7. 50.39 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB353,4,161350.39 (2) The use of the title “hospital” to represent or identify any facility 14which does not meet the definition of a “hospital” as provided herein or is not 15subject to approval under ss. 50.32 to 50.39 50.42 is prohibited, except that 16institutions governed by s. 51.09 are exempt.AB353,817Section 8. 50.39 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB353,5,31850.39 (3) Facilities governed by ss. 45.50, 48.62, 49.70, 49.72, 50.02, 51.09, 19and 252.10, juvenile correctional facilities as defined in s. 938.02 (10p), correctional 20institutions governed by the department of corrections under s. 301.02, and the 21offices and clinics of persons licensed to treat the sick under chs. 446, 447, and 448 22are exempt from ss. 50.32 to 50.39 50.42. Sections 50.32 to 50.39 50.42 do not 23abridge the rights of the medical examining board, physician assistant affiliated 24credentialing board, physical therapy examining board, podiatry affiliated 1credentialing board, dentistry examining board, pharmacy examining board, 2chiropractic examining board, and board of nursing in carrying out their statutory 3duties and responsibilities.AB353,94Section 9. 50.39 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB353,5,8550.39 (4) All orders issued by the department pursuant to ss. 50.32 to 50.39 650.42 shall be enforced by the attorney general. The circuit court of Dane County 7shall have jurisdiction to enforce such orders by injunctional and other appropriate 8relief.AB353,109Section 10. 50.40 of the statutes is created to read:AB353,5,101050.40 Hospital price transparency. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB353,5,1211(a) “Ancillary service” means a hospital item or service that a hospital 12customarily provides as part of a shoppable service.AB353,5,1413(b) “Chargemaster” means the list of all hospital items or services maintained 14by a hospital for which the hospital has established a charge.AB353,5,1715(c) “De-identified maximum negotiated charge” means the highest charge 16that a hospital has negotiated with all 3rd-party payers for a hospital item or 17service.AB353,5,1918(d) “De-identified minimum negotiated charge” means the lowest charge that 19a hospital has negotiated with all 3rd-party payers for a hospital item or service.AB353,5,2120(e) “Discounted cash price” means the charge that applies to an individual 21who pays cash, or a cash equivalent, for a hospital item or service.AB353,5,2322(f) “Gross charge” means the charge for a hospital item or service that is 23reflected on a hospital’s chargemaster, absent any discounts.AB353,6,424(g) “Hospital items or services” means all items and services, including 1individual items and services and service packages, that may be provided by a 2hospital to a patient in connection with an inpatient admission or an outpatient 3department visit for which the hospital has established a standard charge, 4including all of the following:AB353,6,551. Supplies and procedures.AB353,6,662. Room and board.AB353,6,773. Use of the hospital and other areas.AB353,6,984. Services of physicians and nonphysician practitioners employed by the 9hospital.AB353,6,11105. Any other item or service for which a hospital has established a standard 11charge.AB353,6,1412(gm) “Hospital price transparency laws” means 42 USC 300gg-18 and any 13regulations adopted by the federal department of health and human services 14implementing 42 USC 300gg-18, including 45 CFR part 180.AB353,6,1715(h) “Machine-readable format” means a digital representation of information 16in a file that can be imported or read into a computer system for further processing. 17“Machine-readable format” includes .XML, .JSON, and .CSV formats.AB353,6,1918(i) “Payer-specific negotiated charge” means the charge that a hospital has 19negotiated with a 3rd-party payer for a hospital item or service.AB353,6,2120(j) “Service package” means an aggregation of individual hospital items or 21services into a single service with a single charge.AB353,6,2322(k) “Shoppable service” means a service that may be scheduled by a health 23care consumer in advance.AB353,7,31(L) “Standard charge” means the regular rate established by the hospital for 2a hospital item or service provided to a specific group of paying patients and 3includes all of the following:AB353,7,441. The gross charge.AB353,7,552. The payer-specific negotiated charge. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab353 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab353 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB353 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB353 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB353: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting